Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 20, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 20-3104 and 20-3105, to read: START_STATUTE20-3104. Health care insurer; claim denials; contact person If a health care insurer denies a claim for any reason, the health care insurer shall provide both of the following: 1. A telephone number or email address to reach a department that can provide a detailed explanation and address questions as to why the claim was denied. 2. A substantive response to questions about why the claim was denied within two business days after RECEIPT of the questions. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE20-3105. Health care insurer; prior authorization denials; contact person If a health care insurer denies a prior authorization for any reason, the health care insurer shall provide both of the following: 1. A telephone number or email address to reach a department that can provide a detailed explanation and address questions as to why the prior authorization was denied. 2. A substantive response to questions about why the prior authorization was denied within two business days after receipt of the questions. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date Sections 20-3104 and 20-3105, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, are effective from and after June 30, 2027.